Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. In General
§ 2-6-120.
Notification of executor; disposition where no petition filed.

Upon receipt of a will for filing, with information that the maker thereof is dead, the clerk shall notify the party, if any, named as executor of the will, and as many of the distributees named therein as may be readily located. If no action pursuant to W.S.

2-6-121

,

2-6-122

or

2-6-201

is taken by any party within thirty (30) days after the giving of such notice, the clerk shall report the matter to the court and the court may make orders as it deems appropriate for the disposition of the will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2.

§ 2-6-121.
Petition and procedure for filing of will without probate or administration.

Concurrently with the filing with the clerk of a will of a deceased person, or at any time thereafter, the executor or any distributee named therein may file a sworn petition for filing of the will without probate or administration. The petition shall show:

The date and place of death of the decedent, and county and state of last residence of the decedent;

The names, ages and residences of the heirs and devisees of the decedent, so far as known to the petitioner;

That a true copy of the will and a true copy of the petition have been mailed to each of the heirs and devisees; and

That, pending possible subsequent action, the petition and the will are to be filed and indexed by the clerk, without further proceedings.

The clerk shall receive, file and index the petition, and annex the will thereto, and maintain same as part of the permanent files. No filing fee shall be charged.

No proceedings under this section may be commenced after the filing of a petition under W.S.

2-6-122

or

2-6-201

, nor after the entry of an order by the court pursuant to W.S.

2-6-120

making other provisions for the disposition of the will.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 151, § 1.

§ 2-6-122.
Petition and procedure for filing and probate of will without administration.

Concurrently with the filing with the clerk of a will of a deceased person, or at any time thereafter prior to the filing of a petition pursuant to W.S.

2-6-201

and prior to the entry of any order by the court pursuant to W.S.

2-6-120

making other provisions for the disposition of the will, any party who would be entitled to letters testamentary under the provisions of W.S.

2-6-208

may file with the clerk a sworn petition for probate of will without administration. The petition shall show:

The date and place of death of the decedent, and county and state of last residence of the decedent;

The names, ages and residences of the heirs and devisees of the decedent;

That a true copy of the will and a true copy of the petition have been mailed to each of the heirs and devisees; and

That the petition prays for probate of the will, without administration.

A filing fee for the petition shall be charged, equal to the minimum fee applicable to proceedings under W.S.

2-6-203

.

Upon the filing of the petition, proceedings shall be had as provided in W.S.

2-6-203

through

2-6-206

, and order shall issue and notices be given as provided in W.S.

2-6-209

if the will is found entitled to probate, except that the order shall not include the appointment of an executor, but recite that the will is admitted to probate without administration.

After the entry of the order admitting the will to probate, the petitioner shall, at his own expense, cause to be published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the probate was granted a notice in substantially the following form:

State of Wyoming County of In the Matter of the Estate of , Deceased. In the District Court Judicial District Probate No. Notice of Proof of Will Without Administration TO ALL PERSONS INTERESTED IN SAID ESTATE: You are hereby notified that on the day of , (year), the Last Will and Testament of Decedent was admitted to probate by the above named court and there will be no present administration of the estate. Any action to set aside the Will shall be filed in the Court within three (3) months from the date of the first publication of this notice, or thereafter be forever barred. Dated , (year). Proponent PUBLISH: (once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks)

Click to view

The provisions of W.S.

2-6-301

through

2-6-306

apply to proceedings under this section.

In the event administration of the estate is desired at any later date, any party designated in W.S.

2-6-208

, in the order of preference set forth therein, may petition the court for the issuance of letters testamentary.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 151, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

§ 2-6-123.
Filing of will, with or without probate not to bar collection by affidavit.

No proceedings pursuant to W.S.

2-6-120

through

2-6-122

shall bar any proceedings pursuant to W.S.

2-1-201

through

2-1-203

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 151, § 1.

§ 2-6-124.
Written statement referred to in will disposing of certain personal property.

A will may refer to a written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will, other than money, evidences of indebtedness, documents of title, securities and property used in trade or business. To be admissible under this section as evidence of the intended disposition, the writing shall:

Be dated;

Be in the handwriting of the testator or signed by him; and

Include a description of the items and devisees with reasonable certainty.

The written statement or list may be prepared before or after execution of the will, and may be altered by the testator after its preparation which alteration shall be signed and dated by the testator.

The written statement or list may be a writing which has no significance apart from the effect upon the disposition made by the will.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 147, § 1.